voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat.lexc
[Ln][Xp]puolimatka[X][Sab][Nm]puolitta[Bm]matkoitta:puolittamatkoitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolimatka[X][Sko][Nm]puoline[Bm]matkoine:puolinematkoine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolimatka[X][Sin][Nm]puolin[Bm]matkoin:puolinmatkoin	Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sn][Ny]puoli[Bm]päivä:puolipäivä	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sn][Ny]puolen[Bm]päivä:puolenpäivä	Omistusliite_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sg][Ny]puolen[Bm]päivän:puolenpäivän	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sp][Ny]puolta[Bm]päivää:puoltapäivää	NimisanaLiOlAA_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Ses][Ny]puolena[Bm]päivänä:puolenapäivänä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Str][Ny]puoleksi[Bm]päiväksi:puoleksipäiväksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sine][Ny]puolessa[Bm]päivässä:puolessapäivässä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sela][Ny]puolesta[Bm]päivästä:puolestapäivästä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sill][Ny]puoleen[Bm]päivää:puoleenpäivää	NimisanaLiOlN_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sade][Ny]puolella[Bm]päivällä:puolellapäivällä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sabl][Ny]puolelta[Bm]päivältä:puoleltapäivältä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sall][Ny]puolelle[Bm]päivälle:puolellepäivälle	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sab][Ny]puoletta[Bm]päivättä:puolettapäivättä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sn][Nm]puolet[Bm]päivät:puoletpäivät	Liitesana_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sn][Nm]puolet[Bm]päivä:puoletpäivä	Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sg][Nm]puolien[Bm]päivi:puolienpäivi	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sg][Nm]puolten[Bm]päivi:puoltenpäivi	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sp][Nm]puolia[Bm]päiviä:puoliapäiviä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Ses][Nm]puolina[Bm]päivinä:puolinapäivinä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Str][Nm]puoliksi[Bm]päiviksi:puoliksipäiviksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sine][Nm]puolissa[Bm]päivissä:puolissapäivissä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sela][Nm]puolista[Bm]päivistä:puolistapäivistä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sill][Nm]puoliin[Bm]päivii:puoliinpäivii	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sade][Nm]puolilla[Bm]päivillä:puolillapäivillä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sabl][Nm]puolilta[Bm]päiviltä:puoliltapäiviltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sall][Nm]puolille[Bm]päiville:puolillepäiville	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sab][Nm]puolitta[Bm]päivittä:puolittapäivittä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sko][Nm]puoline[Bm]päivine:puolinepäivine	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puolipäivä[X][Sin][Nm]puolin[Bm]päivin:puolinpäivin	Liitesana_ä;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sn][Ny]puoli[Bm]sataa:puolisataa	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sn][Ny]puolen[Bm]sata:puolensata	Omistusliite_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sg][Ny]puolen[Bm]sadan:puolensadan	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sp][Ny]puolta[Bm]sataa:puoltasataa	NimisanaLiOlAA_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Ses][Ny]puolena[Bm]satana:puolenasatana	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Str][Ny]puoleksi[Bm]sadaksi:puoleksisadaksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sine][Ny]puolessa[Bm]sadassa:puolessasadassa	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sela][Ny]puolesta[Bm]sadasta:puolestasadasta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sill][Ny]puoleen[Bm]sataa:puoleensataa	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sade][Ny]puolella[Bm]sadalla:puolellasadalla	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sabl][Ny]puolelta[Bm]sadalta:puoleltasadalta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sall][Ny]puolelle[Bm]sadalle:puolellesadalle	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sab][Ny]puoletta[Bm]sadatta:puolettasadatta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sn][Nm]puolet[Bm]sadat:puoletsadat	Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sn][Nm]puolet[Bm]sata:puoletsata	Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sg][Nm]puolien[Bm]satoj:puoliensatoj	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sg][Nm]puolten[Bm]satoj:puoltensatoj	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sp][Nm]puolia[Bm]satoja:puoliasatoja	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Ses][Nm]puolina[Bm]satoina:puolinasatoina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Str][Nm]puoliksi[Bm]sadoiksi:puoliksisadoiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sine][Nm]puolissa[Bm]sadoissa:puolissasadoissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sela][Nm]puolista[Bm]sadoista:puolistasadoista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sill][Nm]puoliin[Bm]satoihi:puoliinsatoihi	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sade][Nm]puolilla[Bm]sadoilla:puolillasadoilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sabl][Nm]puolilta[Bm]sadoilta:puoliltasadoilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sall][Nm]puolille[Bm]sadoille:puolillesadoille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sab][Nm]puolitta[Bm]sadoitta:puolittasadoitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sko][Nm]puoline[Bm]satoine:puolinesatoine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]puolisataa[X][Sin][Nm]puolin[Bm]sadoin:puolinsadoin	Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sn][Ny]puoli[Bm]väli:puoliväli	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sn][Ny]puolen[Bm]väli:puolenväli	Omistusliite_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sg][Ny]puolen[Bm]välin:puolenvälin	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sp][Ny]puolta[Bm]väliä:puoltaväliä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Ses][Ny]puolena[Bm]välinä:puolenavälinä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Str][Ny]puoleksi[Bm]väliksi:puoleksiväliksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sine][Ny]puolessa[Bm]välissä:puolessavälissä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sela][Ny]puolesta[Bm]välistä:puolestavälistä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sill][Ny]puoleen[Bm]välii:puoleenvälii	NimisanaLiOlN_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sade][Ny]puolella[Bm]välillä:puolellavälillä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sabl][Ny]puolelta[Bm]väliltä:puoleltaväliltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sall][Ny]puolelle[Bm]välille:puolellevälille	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sab][Ny]puoletta[Bm]välittä:puolettavälittä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sn][Nm]puolet[Bm]välit:puoletvälit	Liitesana_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sn][Nm]puolet[Bm]väli:puoletväli	Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sg][Nm]puolien[Bm]väli:puolienväli	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sg][Nm]puolten[Bm]väli:puoltenväli	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sp][Nm]puolia[Bm]välejä:puoliavälejä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Ses][Nm]puolina[Bm]väleinä:puolinaväleinä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Str][Nm]puoliksi[Bm]väleiksi:puoliksiväleiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sine][Nm]puolissa[Bm]väleissä:puolissaväleissä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sela][Nm]puolista[Bm]väleistä:puolistaväleistä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sill][Nm]puoliin[Bm]väleihi:puoliinväleihi	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sade][Nm]puolilla[Bm]väleillä:puolillaväleillä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sabl][Nm]puolilta[Bm]väleiltä:puoliltaväleiltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sall][Nm]puolille[Bm]väleille:puolilleväleille	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sab][Nm]puolitta[Bm]väleittä:puolittaväleittä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sko][Nm]puoline[Bm]väleine:puolineväleine	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliväli[X][Sin][Nm]puolin[Bm]välein:puolinvälein	Liitesana_ä;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sn][Ny]puoli[Bm]yö:puoliyö	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sn][Ny]puolen[Bm]yö:puolenyö	Omistusliite_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sg][Ny]puolen[Bm]yön:puolenyön	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sp][Ny]puolta[Bm]yötä:puoltayötä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Ses][Ny]puolena[Bm]yönä:puolenayönä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Str][Ny]puoleksi[Bm]yöksi:puoleksiyöksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sine][Ny]puolessa[Bm]yössä:puolessayössä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sela][Ny]puolesta[Bm]yöstä:puolestayöstä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sill][Ny]puoleen[Bm]yöhö:puoleenyöhö	NimisanaLiOlN_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sade][Ny]puolella[Bm]yöllä:puolellayöllä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sabl][Ny]puolelta[Bm]yöltä:puoleltayöltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sall][Ny]puolelle[Bm]yölle:puolelleyölle	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sab][Ny]puoletta[Bm]yöttä:puolettayöttä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sn][Nm]puolet[Bm]yöt:puoletyöt	Liitesana_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sn][Nm]puolet[Bm]yö:puoletyö	Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sg][Nm]puolien[Bm]öid:puolienöid	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sg][Nm]puolten[Bm]öitt:puoltenöitt	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sp][Nm]puolia[Bm]öitä:puoliaöitä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Ses][Nm]puolina[Bm]öinä:puolinaöinä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Str][Nm]puoliksi[Bm]öiksi:puoliksiöiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sine][Nm]puolissa[Bm]öissä:puolissaöissä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sela][Nm]puolista[Bm]öistä:puolistaöistä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sill][Nm]puoliin[Bm]öihi:puoliinöihi	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sade][Nm]puolilla[Bm]öillä:puolillaöillä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sabl][Nm]puolilta[Bm]öiltä:puoliltaöiltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sall][Nm]puolille[Bm]öille:puolilleöille	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sab][Nm]puolitta[Bm]öittä:puolittaöittä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sko][Nm]puoline[Bm]öine:puolineöine	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]puoliyö[X][Sin][Nm]puolin[Bm]öin:puolinöin	Liitesana_ä;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sn][Ny]raitis[Bm]ilma:raitisilma	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sn][Ny]raittiin[Bm]ilma:raittiinilma       Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sg][Ny]raittiin[Bm]ilman:raittiinilman	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sp][Ny]raitista[Bm]ilmaa:raitistailmaa	NimisanaLiOlAA_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Ses][Ny]raittiina[Bm]ilmana:raittiinailmana	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Str][Ny]raittiiksi-[Bm]ilmaksi:raittiiksi-ilmaksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sine][Ny]raittiissa[Bm]ilmassa:raittiissailmassa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sela][Ny]raittiista[Bm]ilmasta:raittiistailmasta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sill][Ny]raittiiseen[Bm]ilmaa:raittiiseenilmaa	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sade][Ny]raittiilla[Bm]ilmalla:raittiillailmalla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sabl][Ny]raittiilta[Bm]ilmalta:raittiiltailmalta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sall][Ny]raittiille[Bm]ilmalle:raittiilleilmalle	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sab][Ny]raittiitta[Bm]ilmatta:raittiittailmatta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sn][Nm]raittiit[Bm]ilmat:raittiitilmat		Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sn][Nm]raittiit[Bm]ilma:raittiitilma		Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sg][Nm]raittiiden[Bm]ilmoj:raittiidenilmoj		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sg][Nm]raittiitten[Bm]ilmoj:raittiittenilmoj		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sg][Nm]raittiiden[Bm]ilma:raittiidenilma		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviInJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sg][Nm]raittiitten[Bm]ilma:raittiittenilma		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviInJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sp][Nm]raittiita[Bm]ilmoja:raittiitailmoja		NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Ses][Nm]raittiina[Bm]ilmoina:raittiinailmoina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Str][Nm]raittiiksi-[Bm]ilmoiksi:raittiiksi-ilmoiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sine][Nm]raittiissa[Bm]ilmoissa:raittiissailmoissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sela][Nm]raittiista[Bm]ilmoista:raittiistailmoista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sill][Nm]raittiisiin[Bm]ilmoihi:raittiisiinilmoihi	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]raitisilma[X][Sill][Nm]raittiihin[Bm]ilmoihi:raittiihinilmoihi	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
